Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 2640 (2) 91 sb/js/md H.F. 2640 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 708C.1 Weather engineering. 1 1. The emission, injection, release, or dispersion, by any 2 means, of a chemical, a chemical compound, a substance, or an 3 apparatus into the atmosphere within the borders of this state 4 for the express purpose of affecting the temperature, weather, 5 climate, or intensity of sunlight, or any other purpose not 6 presently regulated by state or federal law, is prohibited. 7 2. a. Any person, including any public or private 8 corporation, who violates this section commits a class âDâ 9 felony. For a corporation in violation of this section, the 10 officers, directors, or employees of the corporation shall 11 also be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred 12 thousand dollars. 13 b. Each day a violation of subsection 1 occurs constitutes a 14 separate offense. 15 3. This section shall not apply to the aerial application 16 of a fertilizer, pesticide, herbicide, fungicide, or any other 17 agricultural input by a licensed aerial applicator or person 18 acting under the authority of federal or state law, provided 19 such substance is applied in accordance with all applicable 20 regulations and is not intended or designed for the express 21 purpose of affecting the temperature, weather, climate, or 22 intensity of sunlight. 23 -1- HF 2640 (2) 91 sb/js/md 1/ 1